New York, session 2025-2026, A10146.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The tax law is amended by adding a new section 1202-ll to 2 read as follows: 3 § 1202-ll. Hotel or motel taxes in the village of Greenport. (1) 4 Notwithstanding any other provisions of law to the contrary, the village 5 of Greenport, in the county of Suffolk, is hereby authorized and 6 empowered to adopt and amend local laws imposing in such village a tax, 7 in addition to any other tax authorized and imposed pursuant to this 8 article such as the legislature has or would have the power and authori- 9 ty to impose upon persons occupying hotel or motel rooms in such 10 village. For the purposes of this section, the term "hotel" or "motel" 11 shall mean and include any facility consisting of rentable units and 12 providing lodging on an overnight basis and shall include those facili- 13 ties designated and commonly known as "bed and breakfast" and "tourist" 14 facilities. The rates of such tax shall not exceed five percent of the 15 per diem rental rate for each room, provided however, that such tax 16 shall not be applicable to a permanent resident of a hotel or motel. 17 For the purposes of this section the term "permanent resident" shall 18 mean a person occupying any room or rooms in a hotel or motel for at 19 least ninety consecutive days. 20 (2) Such tax may be collected and administered by the chief fiscal 21 officer of the village of Greenport by such means and in such manner as 22 other taxes which are now collected and administered by such officer or 23 as otherwise may be provided by such local law. 24 (3) Such local laws may provide that any tax imposed shall be paid by 25 the person liable therefor to the owner of the hotel or motel room occu- 26 pied or to the person entitled to be paid the rent or charge for the 27 hotel or motel room occupied for and on account of the village of Green- EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD14343-01-6 A. 10146 2 1 port imposing the tax and that such owner or person entitled to be paid 2 the rent or charge shall be liable for the collection and payment of the 3 tax; and that such owner or person entitled to be paid the rent or 4 charge shall have the same right in respect to collecting the tax from 5 the person occupying the hotel or motel room, or in respect to nonpay- 6 ment of the tax by the person occupying the hotel or motel room, as if 7 the tax were a part of the rent or charge and payable at the same time 8 as the rent or charge; provided, however, that the chief fiscal officer 9 of the village, specified in such local law, shall be joined as a party 10 in any action or proceeding brought to collect the tax by the owner or 11 by the person entitled to be paid the rent or charge. 12 (4) Such local laws may provide for the filing of returns and the 13 payment of the tax on a monthly basis or on the basis of any longer or 14 shorter period of time. 15 (5) This section shall not authorize the imposition of such tax upon 16 any transaction, by or with any of the following in accordance with 17 section twelve hundred thirty of this article: 18 a. The state of New York, or any public corporation (including a 19 public corporation created pursuant to agreement or compact with another 20 state or the Dominion of Canada), improvement district or other poli- 21 tical subdivision of the state; 22 b. The United States of America, insofar as it is immune from taxa- 23 tion; 24 c. Any corporation or association, or trust, or community chest, fund 25 or foundation organized and operated exclusively for religious, charita- 26 ble or educational purposes, or for the prevention of cruelty to chil- 27 dren or animals, and no part of the net earnings of which inures to the 28 benefit of any private shareholder or individual and no substantial part 29 of the activities of which is carrying on propaganda, or otherwise 30 attempting to influence legislation; provided, however, that nothing in 31 this paragraph shall include an organization operated for the primary 32 purpose of carrying on a trade or business for profit, whether or not 33 all of its profits are payable to one or more organizations described in 34 this paragraph. 35 (6) Any final determination of the amount of any tax payable hereunder 36 shall be reviewable for error, illegality or unconstitutionality or any 37 other reason whatsoever by a proceeding under article seventy-eight of 38 the civil practice law and rules if application therefor is made to the 39 supreme court within thirty days after the giving of the notice of such 40 final determination, provided, however, that any such proceeding under 41 article seventy-eight of the civil practice law and rules shall not be 42 instituted unless: 43 a. The amount of any tax sought to be reviewed, with such interest and 44 penalties thereon as may be provided for by local law shall be first 45 deposited and there is filed an undertaking, issued by a surety company 46 authorized to transact business in this state and approved by the super- 47 intendent of insurance of this state as to solvency and responsibility, 48 in such amount as a justice of the supreme court shall approve to the 49 effect that if such proceeding be dismissed or the tax confirmed the 50 petitioner will pay all costs and charges which may accrue in the prose- 51 cution of such proceeding; or 52 b. At the option of the petitioner such undertaking may be in a sum 53 sufficient to cover the taxes, interests and penalties stated in such 54 determination plus the costs and charges which may accrue against it in 55 the prosecution of the proceeding, in which event the petitioner shall A. 10146 3 1 not be required to pay such taxes, interest or penalties as a condition 2 precedent to the application. 3 (7) Where any tax imposed hereunder shall have been erroneously, ille- 4 gally or unconstitutionally collected and application for the refund 5 thereof duly made to the proper fiscal officer or officers, and such 6 officer or officers shall have made a determination denying such refund, 7 such determination shall be reviewable by a proceeding under article 8 seventy-eight of the civil practice law and rules, provided, however, 9 that such proceeding is instituted within thirty days after the giving 10 of the notice of such denial, that a final determination of tax due was 11 not previously made, and that an undertaking is filed with the proper 12 fiscal officer or officers in such amount and with such sureties as a 13 justice of the supreme court shall approve to the effect that if such 14 proceeding be dismissed or the tax confirmed, the petitioner will pay 15 all costs and charges which may accrue in the prosecution of such 16 proceeding. 17 (8) Except in the case of a wilfully false or fraudulent return with 18 intent to evade the tax, no assessment of additional tax shall be made 19 after the expiration of more than three years from the date of the 20 filing of a return, provided, however, that where no return has been 21 filed as provided by law the tax may be assessed at any time. 22 (9) All revenues resulting from the imposition of the tax under the 23 local laws shall be paid into the treasury of the village of Greenport 24 and shall be credited to and deposited in the general fund of the 25 village. Such revenues may be used for any lawful purpose. 26 (10) If any provision of this section or the application thereof to 27 any person or circumstance shall be held invalid, the remainder of this 28 section and the application of such provision to other persons or 29 circumstances shall not be affected thereby. 30 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately and shall expire and be 31 deemed repealed three years after such date.